Mississippi, session 2026, SB2491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-11-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-85.  As used in Sections 37-11-87 and 37-11-89, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Cardiac Emergency Response Plan (CERP)" shall mean a written document that establishes the specific steps to reduce death from cardiac arrest in any setting  be it a school, community organization, workplace, or sports facility. (b)  "Automated External Defibrillator (AED)" shall mean a lightweight, portable device that delivers an electric shock through the chest to the heart.  The shock can potentially stop an irregular heartbeat (arrhythmia) and allow a normal rhythm to resume following sudden cardiac arrest (SCA). (c)  "Sudden Cardiac Arrest (SCA)" means when the heart malfunctions and stops beating unexpectedly, and if not treated within minutes, it quickly leads to death. (d)  "High-needs school" means a school where at least fifty percent (50%) of children are eligible to receive free and reduced-priced meals or a school participating in the Community Eligibility Provision or Universal Free Meals.  High-needs schools may also be defined by Title 1 status. SECTION 2.  Section 37-11-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-87.  (1) Beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, each public school shall develop a cardiac emergency response plan (CERP) that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds and, beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, school athletic venue grounds. (2)  Beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, each public school with an athletic department or organized athletic program shall develop a cardiac emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while attending or participating in an athletic practice or event while on school grounds. (3)  School officials shall work directly with local emergency service providers to integrate the CERP into the community's EMS responder protocols.  Each plan shall integrate evidence-based core elements, such as those recommended by the American Heart Association guidelines or another nationally recognized, evidence-based standard. (4)  The CERP shall integrate, at a minimum, the following guidelines: (a)  Establishing a cardiac emergency response team whose members have current CPR and AED training from a nationally recognized organization; (b)  Activating the team in response to a SCA; (c)  A plan for implementing AED placement and routine maintenance within the school; (d)  Disseminating the plan throughout the school campus; (e)  Maintaining ongoing staff training in CPR/AED use; (f)  Practicing using drills annually; (g)  Integrating local EMS with the plan; and (h)  Ongoing and annual review and evaluation of the plan. (5)  Appropriate AED placement shall be dictated by the CERP and in accordance with guidelines set by the American Heart Association or another nationally recognized, evidence-based standard.  An AED must be identified with appropriate signage and be available in an unlocked location on school property within three (3) minutes of each school athletic venue.  The AED shall be accessible during the school day and at any other time in which students are participating in a school-sponsored athletic event or team practice.  A school or local and regional board of education may accept gifts, grants and donations, including in-kind donations designated for the purchase of an AED that meets the standards established by the United States Food and Drug Administration and for the costs incurred to inspect and maintain such device and train staff in the use of such device. (6)  Appropriate school staff shall be trained in first-aid, CPR, and AED use that follow evidence-based guidelines set forth by the American Heart Association or another nationally recognized, evidence-based standard.  Staff trained shall be determined by the CERP, including, but not limited to, licensed coaches, school nurses and athletic trainers. SECTION 3.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-11-89, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-11-89.  (1)  The State Department of Education shall designate Two Million Four Hundred Ninety-nine Thousand Dollars ($2,499,000.00) to aid in implementing CERPs.  Funding shall be used for activities and equipment promoting CERP preparedness in schools, including, but not limited to, the purchase and maintenance of AEDs and the purchase of training and educational materials on CPR and basic first aid. High-needs schools shall be given funding priority. (2)  The State Department of Education may establish a procedure for monitoring compliance by school boards, operators of independent charter schools, and governing bodies of private schools to the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  School boards, operators of independent charter schools, and governing bodies of private schools may accept gifts, grants and donations, including in-kind donations, designated for the purchase of AEDs that meet the standards established by the United States Food and Drug Administration, and for the costs incurred in inspecting and maintaining, and training staff in the use of, such devices. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, * * * 2025 2026.